Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1701
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-1701 to 48-1715 shall be known and may be cited as the Farm Labor Contractors Act.

Laws 1987, LB 344, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB844, § 1.